Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 1

General Provisions

53-1-101. Administration — Short title.

This chapter shall be administered by the state department of agriculture and shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act.”

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-101.

Cross-References. Foreign foods disclosure, title 47, ch. 18, part 18.

Legend drug and controlled substance research, title 53, ch. 14.

Toxic Art Supplies Labeling Act, title 68, ch. 131, part 3.

Law Reviews.

Products Liability of Retailers and Manufacturers in Tennessee (Dix W. Noel), 32 Tenn. L. Rev. 207.

Comparative Legislation. Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act:

Ala. § 20-1-1 et seq.

Ark. Code § 20-56-201 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 26-1-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 217.005 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 196.010 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 106-120 et seq.

Va. Code § 54.1-3457 et seq.

53-1-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Advertisement” means all representations disseminated in any manner or by any means, other than by labeling, for the purpose of inducing, or that are likely to induce directly or indirectly, the purchase of food, drug, devices or cosmetics;

“Alcohol” means:

Rubbing alcohol compound;

Isopropyl alcohol; or

Any product manufactured with any specially denaturing properties, and represented to be a rubbing alcohol compound, or a rubbing alcohol, or an alcohol made especially for massaging or toilet purposes;

“Antiseptic.” The representation of a drug, in its labeling or advertisement, as an “antiseptic” shall be considered to be a representation that it is a germicide, except in the case of a drug purporting to be, or represented as, an antiseptic for inhibitory use as a wet dressing, ointment, dusting powder, or other use that involves prolonged contact with the body;

“Catfish” means any species within the family Ictaluridae or the family Anarchichadidae ;

“Catfish product” means any product capable of use as human food that is made wholly or in part from any catfish or portion of catfish, except products that contain catfish only in small proportions or historically have not been, in the judgment of the commissioner, considered by consumers as products of the United States commercial catfish industry and that are exempted from definition as a catfish product by the commissioner under conditions that the commissioner may prescribe to assure that the catfish or portions of catfish contained in the product are not adulterated and that the products are not represented as catfish products;

“Certificate of free sale” means a certificate issued by the department that certifies that the manufacturer of the food, nonprescription drugs, or cosmetics listed in the document is duly authorized to manufacture the products and either that:

The products may be sold freely to the public in the United States, and the manufacturer is in substantial compliance with this chapter as determined by an inspection conducted by the department; or

The manufacturer has provided the department with a complete copy of the report of the most recent inspection conducted by the United States food and drug administration for each Tennessee location where the foods, nonprescription drugs or cosmetic products for which the certificate is being sought are manufactured; and that, based on the inspection report or reports, it is evident that the manufacturer is authorized to sell the products freely in the United States;

“Color additive” means a material that:

Is a dye, pigment, or other substance made by a process of synthesis or similar artifice, or extracted, isolated, or otherwise derived, with or without intermediate or final change of identity, from a vegetable, animal, mineral or other source; and

When added or applied to a food, drug or cosmetic, or to the human body or any part of the human body, is capable, alone or through reaction with other substances, of imparting color to the food, drug or cosmetic, or to the human body or any part of the human body;

“Color additive” does not include any material that the commissioner, by regulation, determines is used, or intended to be used, solely for a purpose or purposes other than coloring;

“Color” includes black, white and intermediate grays;

Nothing in this subdivision (7) shall be construed to apply to any pesticide chemical, soil or plant nutrient, or other agricultural chemical solely because of its effect in aiding, retarding or otherwise affecting, directly or indirectly, the growth or other natural physiological processes of produce of the soil and thereby affecting its color, whether before or after harvest;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture;

“Contaminated with filth” applies to any food, drug, device or cosmetic not securely protected from dust, dirt, and, as far as possible, from all foreign or injurious contamination;

“Cosmetic” means:

Articles intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, or sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to the human body or any part of the human body for cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering the appearance; and

Articles intended for use as a component of the articles listed in subdivision (10)(A), except that “cosmetic” does not include soap;

“Device,” except when used in subdivision (23) and in §§ 53-1-103(a)(7), 53-1-105(a)(6), 53-1-109(a)(3), and 53-1-112(3), means instruments, apparatus and contrivances, including their components, parts and accessories, intended:

For use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in humans or other animals; or

To affect the structure or any function of the body of humans or other animals;

“Drug” means articles, not including devices or their components, parts or accessories, that are:

Recognized in the official United States Pharmacopoeia, Official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, Official National Formulary, or any supplement to any of them;

Intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in humans or other animals;

Intended, other than food, to affect the structure or any function of the body of humans or other animals; and

Intended for use as a component of any article specified in subdivisions (12)(A)-(C);

“Farm to consumer distribution point” means a temporary or permanent location, that is not open to the general public, where a farmer or the farmer's agent delivers food, produced by the farmer and previously sold under an agreement entered into between the farmer and the consumer, directly to the consumer or the consumer's agent;

“Federal act” means the federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, compiled at 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq., as amended;

“Food” means:

Articles used for food or drink for humans or other animals;

Chewing gum; and

Articles used for components of any article listed in subdivisions (15)(A) and (B);

“Food additive” means any substance, the intended use of which results or may reasonably be expected to result, directly or indirectly, in its becoming a component or otherwise affecting the characteristics of any food, including any substance intended for use in producing, manufacturing, packing, processing, preparing, treating, packaging, transporting or holding food; and including any source of radiation intended for any such use, if the substance is not generally recognized, among experts qualified by scientific training and experience to evaluate its safety, as having been adequately shown through scientific procedures to be safe under the conditions of its intended use; except that “food additive” does not include:

A pesticide chemical in or on an agricultural commodity;

A pesticide chemical to the extent that it is intended for use or is used in the production, storage or transportation of any raw agricultural commodity;

A color additive;

Any substance used in accordance with a sanction or approval granted prior to the enactment of the Food Additives Amendment of 1958, pursuant to the federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act; or

Any substance used in food prior to January 1, 1958, that has been shown through either scientific procedures or experience based on common use in food to be safe under the conditions of its intended use;

“Immediate container” does not include package liners;

“Imported catfish” means catfish that is produced in a nation other than the United States, either according to the usual and customary techniques of aquaculture or in the freshwater lakes, rivers or streams or the marine or estuarine waters of the foreign nation;

“Imported catfish product” means any product capable of use as human food that is made, wholly or in part, from any imported catfish or portion of catfish;

“Intrastate commerce” means any and all commerce within the state and subject to the jurisdiction of the state, and includes the operation of any business or service establishment;

“Label” means a display of written, printed, or graphic matters upon the immediate container of any article, and a requirement made by or under authority of this chapter, that any word, statement, or other information appearing on the label shall not be considered to be complied with unless the word, statement or other information also appears on the outside container;

“Labeling” means all labels and other written, printed or graphic matter:

Upon any article or any of its containers or wrappers; or

Accompanying the article;

“Misleading.” If an article is alleged to be misbranded because the labeling is “misleading,” or if an advertisement is alleged to be false because it is “misleading,” then in determining whether the labeling or advertisement is “misleading,” there shall be taken into account, among other things, not only representations made or suggested by statement, word, design, device, sound, or in any combination of statement, word, design, device, sound, but also the extent to which the labeling or advertisement fails to reveal facts material in the light of the representation or material with respect to consequences that may result from the use of the article to which the labeling or advertisement relates under the conditions of use prescribed in the labeling or advertisement of the article or under conditions of use that are customary or usual;

“New drug” means:

Any drug the composition of which is such that the drug is not generally recognized, among experts qualified by scientific training and experience to evaluate the safety of drugs, as safe for use under the conditions prescribed, recommended or suggested in the labeling of the drug; or

Any drug the composition of which is such that the drug, as a result of investigations to determine its safety for use under the conditions described in subdivision (24)(A), has become so recognized, but that has not, otherwise than in those investigations, been used to a material extent or for a material time under those conditions;

“Official compendium” means the official United States Pharmacopoeia, Official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, Official National Formulary, or any supplement to any of them;

“Person” includes an individual, partnership, corporation and association;

“Pesticide chemical” means:

Any substance or mixture of substances, including disinfectants, intended for preventing, destroying, repelling or mitigating any insects, rodents, nematodes, fungi, bacteria, weeds or other forms of plant or animal life or viruses, except viruses on or in living humans or other animals, that the commissioner declares to be a pest; and

Any substance or mixture of substances intended for use as a plant regulator, defoliant or desiccant;

“Raw agricultural commodity” means any food in its raw or natural state, including all fruits that are washed, colored or otherwise treated in their unpeeled natural form prior to marketing;

“Salvageable merchandise” means any food, drug, cosmetic, device or other item listed in this chapter or any regulations promulgated under this chapter that can be reconditioned, labeled, relabeled, repackaged, recoopered, sorted, cleaned, culled or by any other means be salvaged to meet the requirements of this chapter or those regulations; and

“Selling.” This chapter regarding the “selling” of food, drugs, devices or cosmetics shall be considered to include the manufacture, production, processing, packing, exposure, offer, possession, and holding of those articles for sale, and the supplying or applying of those articles in the conduct of any food, drug or cosmetic establishment. “Selling” does not include infrequent casual sales of honey or the selling or packing of less than one hundred fifty gallons (150 gals.) of honey per year.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.2; Acts 1961, ch. 55, § 1; 1967, ch. 42, § 1; 1971, ch. 163, § 44; 1976, ch. 658, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-102; Acts 2002, ch. 634, § 1; 2002, ch. 640, § 30; 2003, ch. 29, § 1; 2006, ch. 573, § 1; 2017, ch. 272, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The Food Additives Amendment of 1958, referred to in this section, is codified primarily at 21 U.S.C. §§ 321, 331, 342, 346 and 348.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the intent of the general assembly to encourage the expansion of agricultural sales by farmers, please refer to Acts 2017, ch. 272.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added the definition of “farm to consumer distribution point”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 272, § 5. May 4, 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Food, § 2.

53-1-103. Prohibited acts — Penalties — Exceptions.

The following acts, and the causing of the following acts, within the state are prohibited:

The manufacture, sale, or delivery, holding or offering for sale of any food, drug, device or cosmetic that is adulterated or misbranded;

The adulteration or misbranding of any food, drug, device or cosmetic;

The receipt of any food, drug, device or cosmetic that is adulterated or misbranded, and the delivery or proffered delivery of any food, drug, device or cosmetic that is adulterated or misbranded for pay or otherwise;

The sale, delivery for sale, holding for sale, or offering for sale of any article in violation of § 53-1-110, § 53-1-206, § 53-1-208, § 53-1-209, or any rule promulgated thereunder;

The dissemination, in any manner or by any means or through any medium, of any false advertisement or for any advertising medium to knowingly publish false or misleading advertising;

The refusal to permit:

Entry or inspection, or refusal to permit the taking of a sample, as authorized by § 53-1-208; or

Access to or copying of any record as authorized by § 53-1-209;

The giving of a guaranty or undertaking, which guaranty or undertaking is false, except by a person who relied on a guaranty or undertaking to the same effect signed by, and containing the name and address of the person residing in the United States from whom this person received in good faith the food, drug, device or cosmetic;

The removal or disposal of a detained or embargoed article in violation of § 53-1-202;

The alteration, mutilation, destruction, obliteration or removal of the whole or any part of the labeling of, or the doing of any other act with respect to, a food, drug, device or cosmetic, if the act is done while the article is held for sale and results in the article's being misbranded;

The forging, counterfeiting, simulating or falsely representing, or without proper authority using any mark, stamp, tag, label or other identification device authorized or required by regulations promulgated under this chapter;

The using, on the labeling of any drug or in any advertisement relating to the drug, of any representation or suggestion that an application with respect to the drug is effective under § 53-1-110, or that the drug complies with § 53-1-110;

The sale of alcohol in violation of rules and regulations adopted by the United States treasury department, alcohol tax division, or by the department of revenue or the alcoholic beverage commission;

The sale by vending machines of any drugs that are capable of causing physical or mental harm if taken internally in overdoses;

The manufacture, sale, or delivery, holding or offering for sale of any food, drug, device or cosmetic that contains any level of radiation or any amount of pesticide residue, food additive, color additive or other substance, in excess of the amount adopted or prescribed by regulation of the commissioner under authority of § 53-1-107; or

The sale, delivery, holding, processing, or offering for sale any salvageable merchandise in violation of this chapter or any regulation promulgated under this chapter.

Any person who violates subsection (a) commits a Class C misdemeanor.

No person shall be subject to the penalties of subdivision (b)(1) for having violated subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(3) if the person established a guaranty or undertaking signed by, and containing the name and address of, the person residing in the United States from whom the person received in good faith the article, to the effect that the article is not adulterated or misbranded within the meaning of this chapter.

No publisher, radio-broadcast licensee, or agency or medium for the dissemination of an advertisement, except the manufacturer, packer, distributor, or seller of the article to which a false advertisement relates, shall be liable under this section by reason of the dissemination by the publisher, licensee, agency or medium of the false advertisement unless the publisher, licensee, agency or medium has refused, on the request of the commissioner, to furnish the commissioner with the name and post office address of the manufacturer, packer, distributor, seller or advertising agency, who caused the publisher, licensee, agency or medium to disseminate the advertisement.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, §§ 3, 5; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 6580.3, 6580.5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; Acts 1961, ch. 55, § 2; 1963, ch. 226, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1963, chs. 257-259; Acts 1967, ch. 42, § 2; 1971, ch. 163, § 44; 1974, ch. 626, § 1; 1976, ch. 658, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 52-103, 52-105; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2017, ch. 150, § 1.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “§§ 53-1-110, 53-1-206, 53-1-208, 53-1-209, or any rule promulgated thereunder;” for “§§ 53-1-110, 53-1-206 or 53-1-209;” at the end of (a)(4).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 8. April 17, 2017.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Substitution of drugs in prescription, § 39-17-421.

Attorney General Opinions. This Office is not aware of any Tennessee law prohibiting eyelash tinting. Eyelash tinting is governed by the Board of Cosmetology because it is the coloring of hair. OAG 11-51, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 53 (6/22/11).

Cited: Merck & Co. v. Kidd, 242 F.2d 592, 1957 U.S. App. LEXIS 2832 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1957).

53-1-104. Food deemed adulterated.

A food shall be deemed to be adulterated if:

It bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance that may render it injurious to health; but in case the substance is not an added substance, the food shall not be considered adulterated under this subdivision (1)(A) if the quantity of the substance in the food does not ordinarily render it injurious to health;

It bears or contains any added poisonous or added deleterious substance that is unsafe within the meaning of § 53-1-107;

It consists, in whole or in part, of a diseased, contaminated, filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance, or if it is otherwise unfit for food;

It has been produced, prepared, packed or held under unsanitary conditions whereby it may have become contaminated with filth, or whereby it may have been rendered diseased, unwholesome or injurious to health or if it is a potentially hazardous food, which would consist of meat, poultry, liquid eggs and partially cooked egg products, fish, milk and milk products, shellfish, partially cooked bakery products, such as cream filled pies, but not including standard fully cooked bakery products, and other ingredients capable of supporting rapid and progressive growth of infectious or toxigenic micro-organisms and is transported, stored or offered for sale at a product temperature in excess of forty-five degrees Fahrenheit (45° F) if a cold food, or below one hundred forty degrees Fahrenheit (140° F) if a hot food; provided, that a food that is offered for sale in a frozen state must be stored, transported and displayed at zero degrees Fahrenheit (0° F). However, a ten degree Fahrenheit (10° F) product temperature is acceptable for defrosting or recycling periods;

It is the product of a diseased animal or an animal that has died otherwise than by slaughter, or that has been fed upon the uncooked offal from a slaughterhouse; or

Its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance that may render the contents injurious to health;

Any valuable constituent has been, in whole or in part, omitted or abstracted from the food;

Any substance has been substituted, wholly or in part, for the food;

Damage or inferiority has been concealed in any manner; or

Any substance has been added to the food or mixed or packed with the food so as to increase its bulk or weight, or reduce its quality or strength or make it appear better or of greater value than it is;

It is confectionery and it bears or contains any alcohol or nonnutritive article or substance, except harmless coloring, harmless flavoring, harmless resinous glaze not in excess of four tenths of one percent (0.4%), harmless natural gum, and pectin; provided, that this subdivision (3) shall not apply to any confectionery by reason of its containing less than one half of one percent (0.5%) of volume of alcohol derived solely from the use of flavoring extracts, or to any chewing gum by reason of its containing harmless nonnutritive masticatory substances;

It bears or contains a coal-tar color other than one from a batch that has been certified under the federal act; or

The food has been made to appear of better quality than the product actually is through the use of any form of illumination that, by type, color, density, or by other means, alters the appearance of the food product; or if packaging or other materials are used that impart a misleading color or appearance to the food. However, the mere keeping of freshly cooked or prepared foods or liquids warmed pending their being served for consumption, through the use of heat generating lamps of any color, shall not constitute an adulteration.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.10; Acts 1974, ch. 626, § 2; 1976, ch. 658, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-110.

Cross-References. “Federal act” defined, § 53-1-102.

Cited: Merck & Co. v. Kidd, 242 F.2d 592, 1957 U.S. App. LEXIS 2832 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1957).

53-1-105. Food deemed misbranded.

A food shall be deemed to be misbranded if:

Its labeling is false or misleading in any particular;

It is offered for sale under the name of another food;

It is an imitation of another food, unless its label bears, in type of uniform size and prominence, the word “imitation,” and immediately thereafter, the name of the food imitated;

Its container is so made, formed or filled as to be misleading;

In package form, unless it bears a label containing:

The name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer or distributor; and

An accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure or numerical count; provided, that under this subdivision (5) reasonable variations shall be permitted, and exemptions as to small packages shall be established, by regulations prescribed by the commissioner;

Any word, statement or other information required by this chapter to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed on the label or labeling with such conspicuousness, as compared with other words, statements, designs or devices, in the labeling, and such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use;

It purports to be or is represented as a food for which a definition and standard of identity has been prescribed by regulations as provided in § 53-1-205, unless:

It conforms to the definition and standard; and

Its label bears the name of the food specified in the definition and standard, and insofar as may be required by the regulations, the common names of optional ingredients, other than spices, flavorings and coloring, present in the food;

It purports to be or is represented as a food for which a standard of quality has been prescribed by regulations as provided by § 53-1-205 and its quality falls below the standard, unless its label bears, in a manner and form that the regulations specify, a statement that it falls below the standard, or standard of fill of container applicable to the food;

It is not subject to subdivision (7), unless its label bears:

The common or usual name of the food, if there is one; and

In case it is fabricated from two (2) or more ingredients, the common or usual name of each ingredient; except that spices, flavorings and colorings, other than those sold as spices, flavoring and colorings, may be designated as spices, flavorings and colorings, without naming each; provided, that to the extent that compliance with the requirements of this subdivision (9)(B) is impractical or results in deception or unfair competition, exemption shall be established by regulations promulgated by the commissioner. The requirements of this subdivision (9)(B) shall not apply to any carbonated beverage, the ingredients of which have been fully and correctly disclosed, to the extent prescribed by this subdivision (9)(B), to the commissioner in an affidavit;

It purports to be or is represented for special dietary uses, unless its label bears information concerning its vitamin, mineral and other dietary properties that the commissioner determines to be, and by regulations prescribes, as necessary in order to fully inform purchasers as to its value for special dietary uses; or

It bears or contains any artificial flavoring, artificial coloring or chemical preservatives, unless it bears labeling stating that fact; provided, that to the extent that compliance with the requirements of this subdivision (11) is impracticable, exemptions shall be established by regulations promulgated by the commissioner. This subdivision (11) with respect to artificial coloring shall not apply in the case of butter, cheese or ice cream.

Any poultry, poultry product, meat, or meat food product offered for sale, sold, or distributed in this state and labeled or advertised as “Tennessee-raised” or by a similar designation is misbranded if the poultry or animal was not raised in this state.

The commissioner may waive a determination that poultry, a poultry product, meat, or a meat food product is misbranded under subdivision (b)(1) upon application of the producer or processor, if the commissioner finds that a waiver is warranted due to economic factors, including, but not limited to, the proximity of processing facilities to the producer and the availability of processing facilities in this state.

As used in this subsection (b):

“Meat”, “meat food products”, “poultry”, and “poultry products” have the same meanings as defined in § 53-7-202; and

“Tennessee-raised” means:

For poultry and poultry products, that the poultry was raised solely in this state from no later than the seventh day after hatching and processed solely in this state; and

For meat and meat food products, that the animal was born, raised, and processed solely in this state.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 11; C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.11; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-111; Acts 2020, ch. 725, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 725, § 2. October 1, 2020.

Collateral References.

Constitutionality of statutes relating to branding of farm products. 73 A.L.R. 1445.

Importation of product or place of production, statute requiring label giving notice as to. 83 A.L.R. 1409, 124 A.L.R. 572.

Literature other than that attached to product itself, statutory provisions against misbranding or false labeling as applicable to. 143 A.L.R. 1453.

Oleomargarine or other substitute for butter, regulations as to marking or labeling of. 53 A.L.R. 478.

Validity and construction of statutes, ordinances or regulations concerning the labeling or branding of horse meat to be sold for human consumption. 19 A.L.R.2d 1013.

Law Reviews.

Products Liability: Tennessee Retailers, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 385.

53-1-106. Certain food exempted from affirmative labeling requirements.

Food that is, in accordance with the practice of the trade, to be processed, labeled or repacked in substantial quantities at an establishment other than the establishment where it was originally processed or packed is exempt from the affirmative labeling requirement of this chapter while it is in transit in intrastate commerce from one establishment to the other, if the transit is made in good faith for those completion purposes only; but the food is otherwise subject to all the applicable provisions of this chapter.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.13; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-113.

53-1-107. Poisonous or deleterious substance — Regulations as to use.

Any poisonous or deleterious substance, which shall include, but not be limited to, pesticide chemicals, food additives, color additives and radiation sources, added to any food pursuant to § 53-1-104, to any drug or device pursuant to § 53-1-108, or to any cosmetic pursuant to § 53-1-111, shall be deemed unsafe for the purposes of application of §§ 53-1-104(1)(B), 53-1-108(1) and 53-1-111(1), except where the substance:

Is required in the production of the food;

Cannot be avoided by good manufacturing practice; or

Has been shown by competent scientific evidence, acceptable to the commissioner, to be useful in the interest of the health of the consumer.

When the substance is required, cannot be avoided or has been shown to be in the interest of the health of the consumer, as provided in subsection (a), the commissioner may promulgate regulations limiting the quantity in or on the foods, drugs, devices or cosmetics to the extent that the commissioner finds necessary for the protection of public health, and any quantity exceeding the limits so fixed shall be deemed unsafe for the purposes of application of §§ 53-1-104(1)(B), 53-1-108(1) and 53-1-111(1).

The commissioner may adopt without hearing any regulations identical with regulations limiting the quantity of any substance in or on foods, drugs, devices or cosmetics adopted under authority of the federal act.

In determining the quantity of the added substance to be tolerated in or on different articles of foods, drugs, devices or cosmetics, the commissioner shall take into account the extent to which the use of the substance is required or cannot be avoided in the production or manufacture of the article and the other ways in which the health and economic interests of the consumer may be affected by the same or other poisonous or deleterious substances.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.14; Acts 1961, ch. 55, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-114.

Cross-References. “Federal act” defined, § 53-1-102.

Law Reviews.

An Examination of the Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339.

Collateral References.

What is “device” within meaning of § 201(h) of Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. § 321(h)). 129 A.L.R. Fed. 343.

53-1-108. Drugs or devices deemed adulterated.

A drug or device shall be deemed to be adulterated if:

It consists, in whole or in part, of any filthy, putrid or decomposed substance;

It has been produced, prepared, packed or held under unsanitary conditions whereby it may have been contaminated with filth, or whereby it may have been rendered injurious to health;

It is a drug and its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance that may render the contents injurious to health; or

It is a drug and it bears or contains, for purposes of coloring only, a coal-tar color other than one from a batch certified under the authority of the federal act;

It purports to be or is represented as a drug, the name of which is recognized in an official compendium, and its strength differs from, or its quality or purity falls below, the standard set forth in the compendium;

The determination as to strength, quality or purity shall be made in accordance with the tests or methods of assay set forth in the compendium, or in the absence or inadequacy of those tests or methods of assay, those prescribed by the United States department of agriculture;

No drug defined in an official compendium shall be deemed to be adulterated under this subdivision (2) because it differs from the standard of strength, quality or purity for the drug set forth in the compendium, if its difference in strength, quality or purity from the standard is plainly stated on its label;

Whenever a drug is recognized in both the United States Pharmacopoeia and the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, it shall be subject to the requirements of the United States Pharmacopoeia, unless it is labeled and offered for sale as a homeopathic drug, in which case it shall be subject to the provisions of the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States;

It is not subject to subdivision (2) and its strength differs from, or its purity or quality falls below, that which it purports or is represented to possess; or

It is a drug and any substance has been:

Mixed or packed with the drug so as to reduce its quality or strength; or

Substituted wholly or in part for the drug.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 15; C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-115.

Cross-References. “Federal act” defined, § 53-1-102.